Hawaii statutes.
§205A-42 Determination of the shoreline.
(a) The board of land and natural resources shall adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 91 prescribing procedures for determining a shoreline and appeals of
shoreline determinations that are consistent with subsection (b); provided that
no determination of a shoreline shall be valid for a period longer than twelve
months, except where the shoreline is fixed by artificial structures that have
been approved by appropriate government agencies and for which engineering drawings
exist to locate the interface between the shoreline and the structure.

(b) The chairperson of the board of land and
natural resources shall cause a public notice to be published in the periodic
bulletin published by the office of environmental quality control. All
comments to the application for shoreline certification shall be submitted in
writing to the state land surveyor no later than fifteen calendar days from the
date of the public notice of the application. Notice of application for certification
shall be identified by tax map key number, and where applicable, street address
and nearest town. [L 1986, c 258, pt of §1; gen ch 1993; am L 1995, c 102, §1]

Case Notes

The board of land and natural resources must consider
historical evidence in making its shoreline determination. 132 H. 9, 319 P.3d
1017 (2014).

The board of land and natural resources' ultimate shoreline
determination was invalid because the agency made errors of law in its amended
decision, including, among other things, positing a multi-variable approach to
shoreline certifications and disregarding a person's testimony. 132 H. 9, 319
P.3d 1017 (2014).

The contention that "the ultimate determination of the
upper reaches of the wash of the waves at high tide ... is [solely] one for
experts and those qualified under the law" is wrong as a matter of law.
132 H. 9, 319 P.3d 1017 (2014).

The issuance of an amended decision by the board of land and
natural resources rendered moot any appeal from the original administrative
agency decision because the original administrative agency decision was no
longer effective. 132 H. 9, 319 P.3d 1017 (2014).

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next